Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 656.230 is amended to read:
656.230. (1) When a worker has been awarded compensation for permanent partial disability, and
the total  amount of the award does not exceed $6,000, the insurer or the self-insured em-
ployer shall pay the total amount of the award to the worker in a lump sum payment.
(2)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this  subsection, when a worker has been awarded
compensation for permanent partial disability, the total amount of  the award exceeds $6,000
and the worker requests payment of all or part of the award in a lump  sum payment, the insurer
or self-insured employer  shall make the payment requested [ unless the ] if:
[(a)] (A) The  worker has  [ not] waived the right to [ appeal the adequacy of the award; ] request
reconsideration of the notice of closure; or
[(b)] (B) The  award has [ not] become final by operation of law[ ;].
(b) The insurer or self-insured employer is  not required to make the payment requested
if:
(A) The insurer or self-insured employer timely requests reconsideration  of the notice
of closure under ORS 656.268 (5)(e) and  the reconsideration proceeding has not yet been
completed;
[(c)] (B) Payment of compensation has been stayed pending a request for  hearing or review un-
der ORS 656.313; or
[(d)] (C) The  worker is enrolled and actively engaged in training according to rules adopted
pursuant to ORS 656.340 and 656.726.
[(2)] (3) Any unpaid balance of the award that is  not paid in a lump sum payment shall be paid
pursuant to ORS 656.216.
[(3) In all cases where  the award for permanent partial disability does not exceed $6,000, the
insurer or the self-insured employer shall pay all of the award to the worker in a lump sum. ]
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 656.230 by section 1 of  this 2025 Act apply to claims
in which a notice of closure is issued on or after January 1, 2026.
Enrolled House Bill 2802 (HB 2802-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2802 (HB 2802-A) Page 2